Hawaii statutes.
§342F-12 Injunctive and other relief.
The director may institute a civil action in any environmental court of
competent jurisdiction for injunctive and other relief to prevent any violation
of this chapter, any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter, or any condition of
a permit or variance issued pursuant to this chapter, without the necessity of
a prior revocation of the permit or variance, to impose and collect civil
penalties, to collect administrative penalties, or to obtain other relief. The
environmental court shall have power to grant relief in accordance with the
Hawaii rules of civil procedure. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §3; am L 1995, c 180,
§19; am L 2014, c 218, §8]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next